Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Watercraft 19 feet or less. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) and subdivision 1a, the fee for a watercraft license for watercraft 19 feet or less in length is $59. (b) The watercraft license fee is: (1) for watercraft, other than personal watercraft, 19 feet in length or less that is offered for rent or lease, $14; (2) for a sailboat, 19 feet in length or less, $23; (3) for a watercraft 19 feet in length or less used by a nonprofit corporation for teaching boat and water safety, as provided in subdivision 4; (4) for a watercraft owned by a dealer under a dealer's license, as provided in subdivision 5; (5) for a personal watercraft, including one offered for rent or lease, $85; and (6) for a new text begin motorized new text end watercraft less than 17 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (1) to (5), $36. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Watercraft over 19 feet. Except as provided in subdivisions deleted text begin 1a,deleted text end 3, 4, and 5, the watercraft license fee: (1) for a watercraft more than 19 feet but less than 26 feet in length is $113; (2) for a watercraft 26 feet but less than 40 feet in length is $164; and (3) for a watercraft 40 feet in length or longer is $209. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 86B.415, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Watercraft surcharge. A surcharge is placed on each watercraft licensed under subdivisions 1 to 5 for control, public awareness, law enforcement, monitoring, and research of aquatic invasive species such as zebra mussel, purple loosestrife, and Eurasian watermilfoil in public waters and public wetlands. The surcharge is: (1) for a watercraft 19 feet or less in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (2) to deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end , $29; (2) for a watercraft, other than personal watercraft, 19 feet in length or less that is offered for rent or lease, $25; (3) for a sailboat 19 feet in length or less, $20; (4) for a watercraft used by a nonprofit corporation for teaching boat and water safety, $14; (5) for a watercraft owned by a dealer under a dealer's license, $50; (6) for a personal watercraft, including one offered for rent or lease, $25; (7) for a new text begin motorized new text end watercraft less than 17 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (2) to (6), $25; deleted text begin (8) for a canoe, kayak, sailboard, paddleboard, paddleboat, or rowing shell over ten feet in length, $20; deleted text end deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end for a watercraft more than 19 feet but less than 26 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), deleted text begin (8),deleted text end and deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end , $38; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end for a watercraft 26 feet but less than 40 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), deleted text begin (8),deleted text end and deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end , $50; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end for a watercraft 40 feet in length or longer, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), deleted text begin (8),deleted text end and deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end , $62; and deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end for a watercraft used primarily for charter fishing, commercial fishing, commercial passenger carrying, or other commercial operation, $50. Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 1a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07916 86B.415 LICENSE FEES. Subd. 1a. Canoes, kayaks, sailboards, paddleboards, paddleboats, or rowing shells. The fee for a watercraft license for a canoe, kayak, sailboard, paddleboard, paddleboat, or rowing shell over ten feet in length is $23.